District of Columbia statutes.
38-3301

Educational services for detained and committed youth under the supervision of the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services.

The District of Columbia Board of Education shall enter into a Memorandum of Understanding (“MOU”) with the Mayor that shall specify how educational services shall be provided to committed and detained youth who are under the supervision of the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services (“DYRS”) and are residing in the Oak Hill Youth Center, the Youth Services Center, and any other replacement or new secure facilities operated by or on behalf of DYRS for youth in DYRS custody. The MOU shall specify in detail how an appropriate educational program shall be delivered to children under the supervision of DYRS and how operating funds, allocations, and other funds that support the provision of these services will be utilized.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 4032, 53 DCR 6899
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4032 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4032 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4032 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
Short title: Section 4031 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle D of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Educational Services for Detained and Committed Youth Act of 2006”.